Hawaii statutes.
[§342J-6.5] Notification. (a) Not
later than forty-five days after June 18, 1993, any person generating or
transporting, or owning or operating a facility for treatment, storage, or
disposal of, any substance listed as hazardous waste or identified by its
characteristics as hazardous waste under 40 Code of Federal Regulations Part
261, shall file with the department a notification stating the location and
general description of the activity and the type and amount of hazardous waste
handled or generated by the person.

(b) Not later than forty-five days after the
adoption pursuant to this chapter of any rule that lists or identifies by
characteristics any substance as hazardous waste, any person generating or
transporting the substance, or owning or operating a facility for treatment,
storage, or disposal of the substance, shall file with the department a
notification stating the location and general description of the activity and
the type and amount of hazardous waste handled or generated by the person.

This subsection shall not apply to activities
or hazardous waste as to which notification has been made in compliance with
subsection (a).

(c) Any person required by this section to
provide notification to the department shall also advise the department, by
January 31 of each year following initial notification, of the following
changes:

(1) Location of business;

(2) Name of business;

(3) Mailing address;

(4) Name of person who owns the facility at which
hazardous waste is handled or generated;

(5) Change of status from small quantity to large
quantity generator; and

(6) Change of status from large quantity to small
quantity generator.

(d) This section shall not apply to:

(1) Generators of less than one hundred kilograms of
hazardous waste per month; or

(2) Any other person exempted from the notification
requirements of this section pursuant to rules adopted by the department. [L
1993, c 267, §1]

Revision Note

"June 18, 1993" substituted for "the effective
date of this section".

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next